Washington statutes.
RCW 11.02.100

Transfer of shares of record—Dividends.

Shares of record in the name of a spouse or domestic partner may be transferred by such person, such person's agent or attorney, without the signature of such person's spouse or domestic partner. All dividends payable upon any shares of a corporation standing in the name of a spouse or domestic partner, shall be paid to such spouse or domestic partner, such person's agent or attorney, in the same manner as if such person were unmarried or not in a state registered domestic partnership, and it shall not be necessary for the other spouse or domestic partner to join in a receipt therefor; and any proxy or power given by a spouse or domestic partner, touching any shares of any corporation standing in such person's name, shall be valid and binding without the signature of the other spouse or other domestic partner.

[ 2008 c 6 s 903; 1990 c 180 s 7.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.